Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3801
(UTC 101) Nebraska Uniform Trust Code, how cited.

(UTC 101) Sections 30-3801 to 30-38,115 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 74;

Laws 2026, LB838, § 19.
July 18, 2026
The Nebraska Uniform Trust Code statutes are derived from the Restatement (Third) of Trusts. In re William R. Zutavern Revocable Trust, 309 Neb. 542, 961 N.W.2d 807 (2021).